Utah statutes.
31A-7-102.   Scope.

(1)  Domestic insurers authorized under former Title 31, Chapter 37, are, on July 1, 1986, automatically converted to domestic insurers authorized under this chapter.  The commissioner may adopt any rules necessary to efficiently and safely effect the conversion.

(2)  Any nonprofit corporation incorporated under this chapter, or subject to this chapter under Subsection (1), and organized for the purpose of establishing, maintaining, and operating a nonprofit plan, whereby hospital care, medical-surgical care, dental care, and other health services are made available to persons who become subscribers to such a plan or plans under a contract with the nonprofit corporation, are subject to the provisions of this chapter.

(3)  This chapter does not apply to persons licensed under Chapter 5, 8, 9, 10, 11, 13, or 14.



Amended by Chapter 20, 1995 General Session

